District of Columbia statutes.
50-381

Metered taxicabs in the District of Columbia.

(a)

In general. —

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and not later than 1 year after October 16, 2006, the District of Columbia shall require all taxicabs licensed in the District of Columbia to charge fares by a metered system; provided that a company that uses digital dispatch for taxicabs may charge fares pursuant to § 50-301.31(b)(1).

(b)

District of Columbia opt out. —

The Mayor of the District of Columbia may exempt the District of Columbia from the requirement under subsection (a) of this section by issuing an executive order that specifically states that the District of Columbia opts out of the requirement to implement a metered fare system for taxicabs.

Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2023, Pub. L. 109-356, § 105
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 3, 61 DCR 12430
Delegation of Authority to the Chairperson of the D.C. Taxicab Commission to amend or increase taxi fare rates and charges, see Mayor’s Order 2011-116, July 1, 2011 ( 58 DCR 5878).
Delegation of Authority to the D.C. Taxi Commission to Review and Adjust Rates for Time and Distance Metered Taxicab System, see Mayor’s Order 2009-104, June 15, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6850).
Delegation of Authority to the D.C. Office of Taxicabs and the Chairman of the D.C. Taxicab Commission and Guidelines for Enforcement of Taximeter Regulations, see Mayor’s Order 2008-68, April 24, 2008 ( 55 DCR 6915).
Delegation of Authority to the D.C. Taxicab Commission, see Mayor’s Order 2007-231, October 17, 2007 ( 55 DCR 167).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-197 added “provided that a company that uses digital dispatch for taxicabs may charge fares pursuant to § 50-301.31(b)(1)” in (a).